Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 8. PUBLIC RETIREMENT SYSTEMS

SUBTITLE F. TEXAS COUNTY AND DISTRICT RETIREMENT SYSTEM

CHAPTER 843. CREDITABLE SERVICE

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 843.001. TYPES OF CREDITABLE SERVICE. The types of service creditable as credited service in the retirement system are prior service, current service, and optional service. A member may not be credited in this system with more than one month of credited service for a specific calendar month, regardless of the number of employers of the member, the positions held, or the types of service.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1876, ch. 453, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Renumbered from Vernon's Ann.Civ.St. Title 110B, Sec. 53.001 by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 179, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 873 (H.B. 1587), Sec. 15, eff. January 1, 2008.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 300 (H.B. 407), Sec. 7, eff. January 1, 2010.

Sec. 843.002. BENEFIT ELIGIBILITY AND AMOUNT. A member's eligibility to receive a benefit is based on the member's amount of credited service and attained age on the effective date of retirement. The monthly amount of a standard retirement annuity is based on the sum of the member's service credit and accumulated contributions and is computed using the member's attained age and the actuarial assumptions described by Section 841.001(1).

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1876, ch. 453, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Renumbered from Vernon's Ann.Civ.St. Title 110B, Sec. 53.002 by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 179, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 122, Sec. 11, eff. Dec. 31, 2001.

Sec. 843.003. AUTHORIZATION TO REESTABLISH SERVICE CREDIT PREVIOUSLY FORFEITED. (a) An eligible member who has withdrawn contributions from the retirement system may reestablish the forfeited service credit in the system if the current service on which the credit was based was performed for a participating subdivision the governing body of which by order authorizes reestablishment of the credit by eligible employee members of the subdivision.

(b) A member eligible to reestablish service credit under this section is one who is a member as an employee of the subdivision on the effective date of an order authorized by the subdivision under Subsection (a).

(c) A member eligible under this section may reestablish service credit by depositing with the retirement system in a lump sum the amount withdrawn from the system, plus a withdrawal charge computed at an annual rate of five percent from the date of withdrawal to the date of redeposit.

(d) Prior service credit forfeited because of a withdrawal of contributions may not be reestablished under this section.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1876, ch. 453, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 491, Sec. 8, eff. June 12, 1985. Renumbered from Vernon's Ann.Civ.St. Title 110B, Sec. 53.003 and amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 179, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 460, Sec. 4, eff. Jan. 1, 1992; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 621, Sec. 8, 9, eff. Jan. 1, 2004.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 873 (H.B. 1587), Sec. 16, eff. January 1, 2008.

Sec. 843.0031. OPTION TO PAY LUMP-SUM AMOUNT. (a) Repealed by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 300, Sec. 38(1), eff. January 1, 2010.

(b) A member who has withdrawn accumulated contributions from the retirement system and who subsequently resumes employment with a subdivision may at any time before retirement pay to the system a lump sum in any amount that does not exceed the actuarial present value of the additional benefits that would have been attributable to the withdrawn contributions. Any amount paid under this subsection and interest accrued on the amount may not be considered in the computation of service credit.

(c) With respect to the account with the subdivision for which contributions had been withdrawn, after the date an amount is deposited under Subsection (b), the member is ineligible to reestablish any service credit with the subdivision that had been forfeited before the date of redeposit, even if the member would otherwise be eligible under an order adopted under Section 843.003.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 621, Sec. 10, eff. Jan. 1, 2004.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 873 (H.B. 1587), Sec. 16, eff. January 1, 2008.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 300 (H.B. 407), Sec. 8, eff. January 1, 2010.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 300 (H.B. 407), Sec. 9, eff. January 1, 2010.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 300 (H.B. 407), Sec. 38(1), eff. January 1, 2010.

Sec. 843.004. COMPOSITION OF SERVICE CREDIT. Service credit consists of allocated prior service credit, current service credit, and multiple matching credit as authorized by a participating subdivision.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 122, Sec. 12, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 300 (H.B. 407), Sec. 10, eff. January 1, 2010.

SUBCHAPTER B. ESTABLISHMENT OF PRIOR SERVICE GENERALLY

Sec. 843.101. CREDITABLE PRIOR SERVICE. Prior service creditable in the retirement system is service performed as an employee of a participating subdivision before the date the subdivision's participation in the retirement system became effective.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1876, ch. 453, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Renumbered from Vernon's Ann.Civ.St. Title 110B, Sec. 53.101 by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 179, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 843.102. ELIGIBILITY FOR PRIOR SERVICE CREDIT. (a) A member is eligible to receive service credit in the retirement system for prior service if the member became a member as an employee of a subdivision:

(1) on the effective date of the subdivision's participation in the retirement system; or

(2) before the second anniversary of the effective date of its participation and continues as an employee of the subdivision for at least six months after reemployment.

(b) The board of trustees may adopt rules concerning eligibility for prior service credit under Subsection (a).

(c) A person who has withdrawn contributions from an account for service for a subdivision and who subsequently resumes employment with the subdivision is not eligible to receive service credit under this section for prior service for the subdivision.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1876, ch. 453, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Renumbered from Vernon's Ann.Civ.St. Title 110B, Sec. 53.102 and amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 179, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 460, Sec. 5, eff. Jan. 1, 1992; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 621, Sec. 11, eff. Jan. 1, 2004.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 873 (H.B. 1587), Sec. 17, eff. January 1, 2008.

Sec. 843.104. CERTIFICATION OF SERVICE AND AVERAGE COMPENSATION. (a) A member eligible to receive prior service credit may claim the credit by filing a detailed statement of the service with the subdivision for which the service was performed. After the statement is filed, the subdivision shall certify the amount of the member's prior service and the member's average prior service compensation.

(b) Repealed by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 873, Sec. 92(6), eff. January 1, 2008.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 873, Sec. 92(6), eff. January 1, 2008.

(d) The board of trustees may adopt rules concerning certification of service and the definition and computation of average prior service compensation under this section.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1876, ch. 453, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Renumbered from Vernon's Ann.Civ.St. Title 110B, Sec. 53.104 and amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 179, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 873 (H.B. 1587), Sec. 18, eff. January 1, 2008.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 873 (H.B. 1587), Sec. 92(6), eff. January 1, 2008.

Sec. 843.105. DETERMINATION OF MAXIMUM AND ALLOCATED PRIOR SERVICE CREDIT. (a) After receiving a certification of prior service and average prior service compensation under Section 843.104, the retirement system shall credit to the member the prior service certified and determine the member's maximum and allocated prior service credits.

(b) The maximum prior service credit is an amount equal to the accumulation at interest of a series of equal monthly amounts for the number of months of certified prior service. Each monthly amount equals twice the subdivision's initial deposit rate, times the member's average prior service compensation. Interest is allowed at the end of each 12-month period on an accumulated amount at the beginning of each period and is credited only for each whole 12-month period. The rate of interest allowed on a maximum prior service credit is three percent a year.

(c) Allocated prior service credit is a monetary credit granted by a subdivision to be computed at a member's retirement date and, together with any multiple matching credit, used in determining a member's supplemental annuity. The allocated prior service credit of a member is an amount equal to a percentage of the maximum prior service credit, increased from the subdivision's effective date of participation to the member's effective date of retirement at the applicable rate of interest provided under this subtitle or prior law for the period.

(d) The governing body of a subdivision may adopt a percentage to be used to determine allocated prior service credits. The rate may be limited to zero or any multiple of five percent.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1876, ch. 453, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Amended by Acts 1981, 67th Leg., 1st C.S., p. 209, ch. 18, Sec. 45, eff. Nov. 10, 1981; Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 491, Sec. 10, eff. June 12, 1985. Renumbered from Vernon's Ann.Civ.St. Title 110B, Sec. 53.105 and amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 179, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 460, Sec. 6, eff. Jan. 1, 1992; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 427, Sec. 14, eff. Dec. 31, 1999; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 122, Sec. 14, eff. Dec. 31, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 873 (H.B. 1587), Sec. 19, eff. January 1, 2008.

SUBCHAPTER C. OPTIONAL PRIOR SERVICE

Sec. 843.201. SERVICE CREDIT FOR CERTAIN PUBLIC EMPLOYMENT. In accordance with rules adopted by the board of trustees, the governing body of a participating subdivision by order may authorize the establishment of credited service and prior service credit in the retirement system for service performed in a public hospital, utility, or other public facility or governmental function during a time the facility was operated or function was performed by a unit of government other than the subdivision and before the date that the public hospital, utility, or other public facility or governmental function was taken over by the subdivision.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1876, ch. 453, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 769, Sec. 2, eff. Aug. 28, 1989. Renumbered from Vernon's Ann.Civ.St. Title 110B, Sec. 53.201 and amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 179, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 11.04(b), eff. Aug. 26, 1991. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 245, Sec. 8, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 427, Sec. 15, eff. Dec. 31, 1999; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 621, Sec. 13, eff. Jan. 1, 2004.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 873 (H.B. 1587), Sec. 20, eff. January 1, 2008.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 873 (H.B. 1587), Sec. 92(8), eff. January 1, 2008.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 300 (H.B. 407), Sec. 11, eff. January 1, 2010.

SUBCHAPTER E. ESTABLISHMENT OF CURRENT SERVICE

Sec. 843.401. CURRENT SERVICE GENERALLY. Current service is service performed by an employee of a participating subdivision while a member of the retirement system and credited as provided under this subtitle and in accordance with rules adopted by the board of trustees.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1876, ch. 453, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Renumbered from Vernon's Ann.Civ.St. Title 110B, Sec. 53.401 by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 179, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 621, Sec. 16, eff. Jan. 1, 2004.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 873 (H.B. 1587), Sec. 21, eff. January 1, 2008.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 300 (H.B. 407), Sec. 12, eff. January 1, 2010.

Sec. 843.402. CURRENT SERVICE CREDIT AND MULTIPLE MATCHING CREDIT. (a) Current service credit is a monetary amount credited by a subdivision to be computed at a member's effective retirement date and used in determining the member's basic annuity. At the determination date, a member's current service credit is an amount equal to the sum of the employee contributions in the member's individual account and the interest accumulated on those contributions as provided by this subtitle.

(b) Multiple matching credit is a monetary amount credited by the governing body of a subdivision to be computed at a member's effective retirement date and, together with any prior service credit, used in determining a member's supplemental annuity. Multiple matching credit is an amount equal to a percentage of the sum of employee contributions in a member's individual account that were made for a particular calendar year and the interest accumulated on those contributions as provided under this subtitle. At the determination date, the multiple matching credit of a member is equal to the sum of the multiple matching credit for all years of the person's membership.

(c) The percentage to be used in the computation of the multiple matching credit for a particular year is adopted by the governing body of a subdivision and applied in accordance with this subtitle.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 873 (H.B. 1587), Sec. 22, eff. January 1, 2008.

SUBCHAPTER F. OPTIONAL CREDITED SERVICE

Sec. 843.501. CREDITED SERVICE FOR LEGISLATIVE SERVICE. A member may establish credited service in the retirement system for service performed as a member of the legislature. A member claiming credited service for previous legislative service shall file with the retirement system a detailed statement of the service.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1876, ch. 453, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Renumbered from Vernon's Ann.Civ.St. Title 110B, Sec. 53.501 by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 179, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 427, Sec. 18, eff. Dec. 31, 1999; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 122, Sec. 17, eff. Dec. 31, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 873 (H.B. 1587), Sec. 24, eff. January 1, 2008.

Sec. 843.502. CREDITED SERVICE FOR QUALIFIED MILITARY SERVICE. (a) In this section:

(1) "Qualified military service" means service in the uniformed services, as that term is defined in the Uniformed Services Employment and Reemployment Rights Act of 1994 (38 U.S.C. Section 4301 et seq.), that meets the requirements of that Act as it now exists or is amended as to the character of service performed.

(2) "USERRA" means the Uniformed Services Employment and Reemployment Rights Act of 1994 (38 U.S.C. Section 4301 et seq.).

(b) All members of the retirement system are entitled to be credited with service for qualified military service that is subject to USERRA. Notwithstanding any provision of this subtitle to the contrary, contributions, benefits, credited service, and service credit for qualified military service will be provided in accordance with USERRA and Section 414(u) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986. The board of trustees may adopt rules for the administration of this section, including rules that modify the terms of this subtitle for the purpose of compliance with the provisions of USERRA.

(c) An eligible member may establish credited service in the retirement system for qualified active duty military service not creditable under Subsection (b). Qualified military service includes military service before becoming an employee of the subdivision. A member eligible to establish credited service under this subsection is one who is vested, based on credited service only in this system and without regard to service that may be established under this subsection, in a service retirement annuity that may begin at the age of 60. An eligible member may establish not more than five years of credited service under this subsection by filing an application with the retirement system.

(d) Repealed by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 300, Sec. 38(2), eff. January 1, 2010.

(e) Repealed by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 300, Sec. 38(2), eff. January 1, 2010.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1876, ch. 453, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Formerly Sec. 53.602. Renumbered by Acts 1981, 67th Leg., 1st C.S., p. 210, ch. 18, Sec. 47, eff. Nov. 10, 1981. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 491, Sec. 12, eff. June 12, 1985. Renumbered from Vernon's Ann.Civ.St. Title 110B, Sec. 53.601 and amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 179, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 427, Sec. 19, eff. Dec. 31, 1999; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 122, Sec. 18, eff. Dec. 31, 2001; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 621, Sec. 18, 37(4), eff. Jan. 1, 2004.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 506 (H.B. 633), Sec. 15, eff. January 1, 2006.

Renumbered from Government Code, Section 843.601 and amended by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 873 (H.B. 1587), Sec. 25, eff. January 1, 2008.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 300 (H.B. 407), Sec. 13, eff. January 1, 2010.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 300 (H.B. 407), Sec. 38(2), eff. January 1, 2010.

Sec. 843.503. CREDITED SERVICE FOR SERVICE WITH SUBDIVISION PREDECESSOR. The governing body of a participating subdivision may, with the consent of and on terms approved by the board of trustees, authorize the establishment of credited service in the retirement system for service performed as an employee of the immediate predecessor entity of the subdivision.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 873 (H.B. 1587), Sec. 26, eff. January 1, 2008.

Sec. 843.504. NO DOUBLE CREDITING OF SERVICE. Except as provided by Chapter 803, only one month of credited service may be established in the retirement system for any calendar month for all service that is creditable under this subtitle.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 873 (H.B. 1587), Sec. 26, eff. January 1, 2008.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 300 (H.B. 407), Sec. 14, eff. January 1, 2010.

Sec. 843.505. CREDITED SERVICE PREVIOUSLY ELIGIBLE FOR RECOGNITION UNDER PROPORTIONATE RETIREMENT PROGRAM. The board of trustees by rule may authorize the retirement system, on application by a member and for the sole purpose of determining eligibility for retirement from this system, to recognize service performed under another system participating under Chapter 803 that would have been recognized by this system under that chapter if the service had not been canceled by a withdrawal of contributions.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 300 (H.B. 407), Sec. 15, eff. January 1, 2010.